Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1044.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 55 heading and section 5501 of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:CHAPTER 55EPINEPHRINE [AUTO-INJECTOR] DELIVERY SYSTEM ENTITIES§ 5501. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system entities.Section 2. The definitions of "administer" and "epinephrine auto-injector" in section 5502 of Title 35 are amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 5502. Definitions.123456789101112131415161718 The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Administer." The direct application of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system to the body of an individual.* * *["Epinephrine auto-injector." A single-use device used for the automatic injection of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body.]"Epinephrine delivery system." A device approved by the Federal Food and Drug Administration that contains a pre-measured dose of epinephrine and is used to administer epinephrine into the human body to prevent or treat a life-threatening allergic reaction.* * *Section 3. Section 5503 of Title 35 is amended to read:§ 5503. Epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems for authorized entities.(a) Prescribing and dispensing.--Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a health care practitioner with prescriptive authority may prescribe epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems in the name of an authorized entity for use in accordance with this section. Pharmacists and health care practitioners may dispense epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems pursuant to a prescription issued in the name of an authorized entity.(b) Supply.--(1) An authorized entity may acquire and stock a supply of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems pursuant to a prescription issued in accordance with this section. The 20250HB1044PN1133 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems shall be stored:(i) in a location readily accessible in an emergency; and(ii) in accordance with:(A) the epinephrine [auto-injector's] delivery system's instructions for use; and(B) any additional requirements that may be established by the department.(2) An authorized entity shall designate employees or agents who have completed the training required under subsection (d) to be responsible for the storage, maintenance, control and general oversight of epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems acquired by the authorized entity.(c) Use.--An employee or agent of an authorized entity or other individual associated with the entity who has completed the training required under subsection (d) may use epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems prescribed under subsection (a) to do any of the following:(1) Provide an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system for immediate administration to any individual, or the parent, guardian or caregiver of the individual, who the employee, agent or other individual associated with the entity believes, in good faith, is experiencing anaphylaxis, regardless of whether the individual has a prescription for an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system or has previously been diagnosed with an allergy.(2) Administer an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system to any individual who the employee, agent or other 20250HB1044PN1133 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual believes, in good faith, is experiencing anaphylaxis, regardless of whether the individual has a prescription for an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system or has previously been diagnosed with an allergy.(d) Training.--(1) An employee or agent of the authorized entity or other individual associated with the entity shall complete an anaphylaxis training program as required by the department. The training shall be conducted by a nationally recognized organization experienced in training laypersons in emergency health treatment, a health care practitioner employed or contracted by the authorized entity or an entity or individual approved by the department. The department may approve specific entities or individuals or may approve classes of entities or individuals to conduct the training. Training may be conducted online or in person and, at a minimum, shall cover:(i) how to recognize signs and symptoms of severe allergic reactions, including anaphylaxis;(ii) standards and procedures for the storage and administration of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system; and(iii) emergency follow-up procedures.(2) The entity or individual that conducts the training shall issue a certificate, on a form developed or approved by the department, to each individual who successfully completes the anaphylaxis training program.(e) Good Samaritan protections.--(1) The following shall not be liable for any injuries or related damages that result from any act or omission taken 20250HB1044PN1133 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this section:(i) An authorized entity that possesses and makes available epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems and its employees, agents and other individuals associated with the entity;(ii) a health care practitioner that prescribes or dispenses epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems to an authorized entity;(iii) a pharmacist or health care practitioner that dispenses epinephrine [auto-injectors] delivery systems to an authorized entity; and(iv) an individual or entity that conducts the training described under subsection (d).(2) The immunity provided under paragraph (1) shall not apply to acts or omissions constituting intentional misconduct or gross negligence.(3) The administration of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system in accordance with this section shall not be considered the practice of medicine or any other profession that otherwise requires licensure.(4) This subsection shall not eliminate, limit or reduce any other immunity or defense that may be available under law, including that provided under 42 Pa.C.S. § 8332 (relating to emergency response provider and bystander good Samaritan civil immunity).(5) An entity located in this Commonwealth shall not be liable for any injuries or related damages that result from the provision or administration of an epinephrine [auto-injector] delivery system outside of this Commonwealth if the entity:20250HB1044PN1133 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) would not have been liable for the injuries or related damages had the provision or administration occurred within this Commonwealth; or(ii) is not liable for the injuries or related damages under the law of the state in which the provision or administration occurred.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1044PN1133 - 6 - 1234567